Utah statutes.
72-4-121.   State highways -- SR-152 to SR-160.
State highways include:
(1)  SR-152.  From Route 71 at 4800 South Street southeasterly on Van Winkle
Expressway to the Route 215 Interchange near 6400 South Street.
(2)  SR-153.  From Route 160 in Beaver easterly by Puffer Lake to Route 89 in
Junction City.
(3)  SR-154.  From Route 15 westerly near 13400 South on Bangerter Highway to
near 3200 West; then northerly to the westbound off ramp  of Route 80 near the
Salt Lake International Airport.
(4)  SR-155.  From Route 10 in Huntington northeasterly to Cleveland; then
northerly to Route 10 at Washboard Junction.
(5)  SR-156.  From Route 198 in Spanish Fork north on Main Street to Route 15.
(6)  SR-157.  From Route 244 at Poplar and Main Streets in Helper southerly
and northeasterly to Kenilworth.
(7)  SR-158.  From Eden Junction on Route 39 northerly to the parking lot of
Powder Mountain Ski Resort.
(8)  SR-159.  From Route 21 near Garrison north to Route 6 near the Utah-
Nevada state line.
(9)  SR-160.  From Route 15 south of Beaver northerly through Beaver to Route
15 north of Beaver.
